Maine, session 132, LD1576.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §318-B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 337, §2, is amended by
amending the section headnote to read:
§318-B. Former executive branch or legislative branch employee lobbying prohibited
Sec. 2. 3 MRSA §318-B, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 337, §2, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
C. "Former employee from the executive branch or legislative branch" means:
(1) An employee who was employed in the executive branch of this State:
(a) In the unclassified service, as defined in Title 5, section 7032, subsection
6‑A;
(b) In the classified service;
(c) In a position for which the salary is subject to adjustment by the Governor
under Title 2, section 6; or
(d) In a major policy-influencing position under Title 5, chapter 71; and
(2) An employee who was employed in the Legislature, including a partisan
legislative employee, nonpartisan legislative employee, committee clerk or
employee of the Office of the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House.
Sec. 3. 3 MRSA §318-B, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 337, §2, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
2. Lobbying prohibited. Beginning January 1, 2026, a former officer or former
employee from the executive branch or legislative branch may not engage in compensated
lobbying until one year after the termination of the employee's executive branch or
legislative branch employment.
Sec. 4. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 1 - 132LR0867(03)